Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.200

Judgment—Appellate review—Payment of award into court.

Any final judgment or judgments rendered by said court upon any finding or findings of any jury or juries, or upon any finding or findings of the court in case a jury be waived, shall be lawful and sufficient condemnation of the land or property to be taken, or of the right to damage the same in the manner proposed, upon the payment of the amount of such findings and all costs which shall be taxed as in other civil cases, provided that in case any defendant recovers no damages, no costs shall be taxed. Such judgment or judgments shall be final and conclusive as to the damages caused by such improvement unless appellate review is sought, and review of the same shall not delay proceedings under said ordinance, if such city shall pay into court for the owners and parties interested, as directed by the court, the amount of the judgment and costs, and such city, after making such payment into court, shall be liable to such owner or owners or parties interested for the payment of any further compensation which may at any time be finally awarded to such parties seeking review of said proceeding, and his or her costs, and shall pay the same on the rendition of judgment therefor, and abide any rule or order of the court in relation to the matter in controversy. In case of review by the supreme court or the court of appeals of the state by any party to the proceedings the money so paid into the superior court by such city, as aforesaid, shall remain in the custody of said superior court until the final determination of the proceedings. If the owner of the land, real estate, premises, or other property accepts the sum awarded by the jury or the court, he or she shall be deemed thereby to have waived conclusively appellate review and final judgment may be rendered in the superior court as in other cases.

[ 2011 c 336 s 261; 1993 c 14 s 1; 1988 c 202 s 10; 1971 c 81 s 39; 1907 c 153 s 16; 1905 c 55 s 16; 1893 c 84 s 16; RRS s 9230. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1907 c 153 s 51, part; RRS s 9276, part, now codified in RCW 8.12.090. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 50; 1893 c 84 s 50, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 14: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 12, 1993]." [ 1993 c 14 s 2.]

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.